Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.122.030

Program eligibility—Student eligibility.

(1) To remain an aerospace training or educational program in which a participant may be registered, the program must have an advisory committee that includes at least one member representing aerospace employers and at least one member from organized labor representing aerospace workers.

(2) To remain an eligible student and receive continuing disbursements under the program, a participant must be considered by the aerospace training or educational program to be making satisfactory progress.

[ 2011 c 8 s 3.]